Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 3. Property and Funds of the University of Alaska.
Sec. 14.40.461.
University research forest.

For the purpose of advancing research into forest practices, ecology, wildlife management, and recreation, a university research forest is established on land described as the “University Research Forest” and identified for conveyance to the Board of Regents in trust for the University of Alaska in the document titled “University of Alaska Land Grant List 2005,” dated January 12, 2005.

Before conveyance of university research forest land to the Board of Regents in trust for the University of Alaska under AS

14.40.365(b)

, the commissioner of natural resources shall manage the university research forest to accomplish the purposes of this section and in accordance with state land use plans adopted under AS

38.04.065

, forest management plans adopted under AS

41.17.230

, and other provisions of law applicable to state-owned land.

Notwithstanding the limitations of AS

14.40.365(l)

, on or before the date a parcel is required to be conveyed to the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska under AS

14.40.365(b)

, the commissioner of natural resources may

convey an irrevocable interest in land located in the research forest that terminates or returns to the state on or before the date the parcel is required to be conveyed under AS

14.40.365(b)

;

sell timber rights and dispose of other renewable resources located in the research forest.

After conveyance of university research forest land to the Board of Regents in trust for the university under AS

14.40.365(b)

, the Board of Regents may disestablish some or all of the university research forest established by this section, and dispose of, or develop, land within the former research forest, if the Board of Regents first

provides to the public and the commissioner of natural resources reasonable notice and an opportunity for comment on the board’s proposed decision regarding disestablishment;

considers comments received from the public and the commissioner of natural resources under (1) of this subsection;

evaluates whether the objectives of advancing research into forest practices, ecology, wildlife management, and recreation can be accomplished without retaining some or all of the research forest;

determines, following notice and any public comment by local timber industry representatives, that disposal of the land will not interfere with commercially viable timber harvest resource development; and

concludes that it is in the best interest of the university to disestablish some or all of the research forest.

History.

(§ 7 ch 136 SLA 2000; am § 6 ch 8 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 14.40.470.
[Renumbered as AS 14.43.015.]

Sec. 14.40.480.
[Renumbered as AS 14.43.020.]

Sec. 14.40.490.
[Renumbered as AS 14.40.491.]

Sec. 14.40.491.
Definition of university receipts.

In AS

14.40.120

—

14.40.491

, “university receipts” includes

student fees, including tuition;

receipts from university auxiliary services;

recovery of indirect costs of university activities;

receipts from sales and rentals of university property;

federal receipts;

gifts, grants, and contracts;

receipts from sales, rentals, and the provision of services of educational activities; and

receipts attributable to amounts distributed from university endowments established and managed under AS

14.40.280

and from the endowment trust fund established and managed under AS

14.40.400

.

History.

(§ 23 ch 138 SLA 1986; § 7 ch 143 SLA 1986; am § 11 ch 9 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.490

. Renumbered in 1987.

Section 23, ch. 138, SLA 1986, and § 7, ch. 143, SLA 1986, both enacted a definition of “university receipts.”
The definitions were substantially the same.
The text set out above is the language enacted in § 23, ch. 138, SLA 1986.

Secs. 14.40.510 — 14.40.550.
[Renumbered as AS 14.43.050 — 14.43.075.]